Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1002.
do enact as follows:SB1002,13Section 1. 250.20 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1002,2,84250.20 (3) From the appropriation account under s. 20.435 (1) (cr), the 5department shall annually award grants for activities to improve the health status 6of economically disadvantaged minority group members. A person may apply, in 1the manner specified by the department, for a grant of up to $50,000 in each fiscal 2year to conduct these activities. An awardee of a grant under this subsection shall 3provide, for at least 50 percent of the grant amount, matching funds that may 4consist of funding or an in-kind contribution. An applicant that is not a federally 5qualified health center, as defined under 42 CFR 405.2401 (b) shall receive priority 6for grants awarded under this subsection. An applicant that provides maternal and 7child health services shall receive priority for grants awarded under this 8subsection.SB1002,2,99